Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.70.030

Formal ratification.

Upon ratification and approval of the western regional higher education compact by any four or more of the specified states or territories in addition to this state, the governor of this state is authorized and directed to execute said compact on behalf of this state and to perform any other acts which may be deemed requisite to its formal ratification and promulgation.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.70.030. Prior: 1955 c 214 s 3. Formerly RCW 28.82.030.]